Utah statutes.
58-3a-303.5.   Continuing education.

(1)  As a condition for renewal of a license under this chapter, each licensee shall, during each two-year licensure cycle or other cycle defined by rule, complete continuing professional education in accordance with standards defined by rule.

(2)  If a renewal period is extended or shortened under Section 58-3a-303, the division shall proportionately increase or decrease the continuing education hours required for licensure renewal under this section.

